Alaska statutes. Title 33. Probation, Prisons, Pardons, and Prisoners.
Article 1. Establishment, Control, and Management.

Sec. 33.30.010.
Commissioner to control and manage state prison facilities. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.011.
Duties of commissioner.

The commissioner shall

establish, maintain, operate, and control correctional facilities suitable for the custody, care, and discipline of persons charged or convicted of offenses against the state or held under authority of state law; each correctional facility operated by the state shall be established, maintained, operated, and controlled in a manner that is consistent with AS

33.30.015

;

classify prisoners;

for persons committed to the custody of the commissioner, establish programs, including furlough programs that are reasonably calculated to

protect the public and the victims of crimes committed by prisoners;

maintain health;

create or improve occupational skills;

enhance educational qualifications;

support court-ordered restitution; and

otherwise provide for the rehabilitation and reformation of prisoners, facilitating their reintegration into society;

provide necessary

medical services for prisoners in correctional facilities or who are committed by a court to the custody of the commissioner, including examinations for communicable and infectious diseases;

psychological or psychiatric treatment if a physician or other health care provider, exercising ordinary skill and care at the time of observation, concludes that

a prisoner exhibits symptoms of a serious disease or injury that is curable or may be substantially alleviated; and

the potential for harm to the prisoner by reason of delay or denial of care is substantial; and

assessment or screening of the risks and needs of offenders who may be vulnerable to harm, exploitation, or recidivism as a result of fetal alcohol syndrome, fetal alcohol spectrum disorder, or another brain-based disorder;

establish minimum standards for sex offender treatment programs offered to persons who are committed to the custody of the commissioner;

provide for fingerprinting in correctional facilities in accordance with AS

12.80.060

;

establish a program to conduct assessments of the risks and needs of offenders sentenced to serve a term of incarceration of 90 days or more; the program must include a requirement for an assessment before a prisoner’s release on parole, furlough, or electronic monitoring from a correctional facility;

establish a procedure that provides for each prisoner required to serve an active term of imprisonment of 90 days or more a written case plan that

takes effect and is provided to the prisoner within 90 days after sentencing;

is based on the results of the assessment of the prisoner’s risks and needs under (7) of this subsection;

includes a requirement to follow the rules of the institution;

is modified when necessary for changes in classification, housing status, medical or mental health, and resource availability;

includes participation in programming that addresses the needs identified in the assessment;

establish a program to begin reentry planning with each prisoner serving an active term of imprisonment of 90 days or more; reentry planning must begin at least 90 days before release on furlough or probation or parole; the reentry program must include

a written reentry plan for each prisoner completed upon release on furlough or probation or parole that includes information on the prisoner’s proposed

residence;

employment or alternative means of support;

treatment options;

counseling services;

education or job training services;

any other requirements for successful transition back to the community, including electronic monitoring or furlough for the period between a scheduled parole hearing and parole eligibility;

coordination with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development to provide access, after release, to job training and employment assistance; and

coordination with community reentry coalitions or other providers of reentry services if available;

for offenders under electronic monitoring, establish

minimum standards for electronic monitoring, which may include the requirement of active, real-time monitoring using global positioning systems; and

procedures for oversight and approving electronic monitoring programs and systems provided by private contractors;

assist a prisoner in obtaining a valid state identification card if the prisoner does not have a valid state identification card before the prisoner’s release; the department shall pay the application fee for the identification card;

provide to the legislature, by electronic means, by January 10 preceding the first regular session of each legislature, a report summarizing the findings and results of the program established under (7) of this subsection; the report must include

the number of prisoners who were provided with written case plans under (8) of this subsection;

the number of written case plans under (8) of this subsection initiated within the preceding year; and

the number of written case plans under (8) of this subsection that were updated in the preceding year; and

enter into an agreement with the Department of Health and Social Services, consistent with the provisions of AS

47.12.105

, for the detention and care of a minor who is waived into adult court under AS

47.12.030

or

47.12.100

.

In this section, "held under authority of state law" includes the confinement of persons under AS 26.05.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986; am § 11 ch 188 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 54 SLA 1994; am § 12 ch 70 SLA 1995; am § 4 ch 49 SLA 1997; am § 31 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 155 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 5 ch 55 SLA 2016; am § 120 ch 4 FSSLA 2019; am § 14 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2016, in subparagraph (a)(8)(B), “subsection” was substituted for “section” to harmonize the 2016 amendments.

Administrative Code. —

For admission to adult correctional facilities, see 22 AAC 5, art. 1.

For security, see 22 AAC 5, art. 2.

For operations, see 22 AAC 5, art. 3.

For classification, see 22 AAC 5, art. 4.

For programs, see 22 AAC 5, art. 5.

For discipline, see 22 AAC 5, art. 6.

For segregation, see 22 AAC 5, art. 7.

For communications, see 22 AAC 5, art. 8.

For discharge, see 22 AAC 5, art. 9.

For sex offender treatment providers, see 22 AAC 30.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2016, added (4)(C) and (7) [now (a)(4)(c) and (a)(7)], and made related changes.

The first 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (7) [now (a)(7)], inserted “; the program must include a requirement for an assessment before a prisoner's release on parole, furlough, or electronic monitoring from a correctional facility;” at the end; added (8), (9), (10), and (11) [now (a)(8), (a)(9), (a)(10), and (a)(11)].

The second 2016 amendment, effective August 7, 2016, added (b). Although the 2016 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2016, under § 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, the governor did not sign the bill until August 6, 2016, and so the actual effective date of the 2016 amendment was August 7, 2016, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, substituted “90 days” for “30 days” in
(a)(7) and in the introductory paragraph of (a)(8), in (a)(7), deleted “and provide to the legislature, by electronic means, by January 15, 2017, and thereafter by January 15, preceding the first regular session of each legislature, a report summarizing the findings and results of the program” following “days or more,” inserted “takes effect and” at the beginning of (a)(8)(A), added (a)(9)(D) and (a)(12), and made related stylistic changes.

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, added (a)(13) and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(b),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments of (a) of this section apply “to sentences imposed on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Section 57(b), ch. 16, SLA 2021, provides that the 2021 amendment of (a) of this section applies to minors subject to AS

47.12.030(a)

, as amended by sec. 22, ch. 16, SLA 2021, and AS

47.12.100

“who are held in a facility operated by the Department of Corrections or a facility operated by the Department of Health and Social Services on or after July 9, 2021.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 16, SLA 2021 (HB 105), which amended (a) of this section, see 2021 House Journal 181 — 182.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A prisoner has the right to refuse treatment with antipsychotic drugs unless a licensed physician or psychiatrist, applying accepted medical standards, determines that the prisoner is suffering from an illness, that the prisoner presents a threat of violence to himself or others, and that the administration of antipsychotic drugs will provide effective treatment for the illness and is necessary to alleviate that threat. January 22, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 33.30.012.
Notice of release, parole, community placement, work release placement, furlough, or escape of sex offender or child kidnapper.

Within 30 days before release of a sex offender or child kidnapper with a duty to register under AS 12.63, the commissioner shall complete the registration of the sex offender or child kidnapper if the offender or kidnapper has not previously registered. The commissioner shall take the sex offender’s or child kidnapper’s photograph, and determine if legible fingerprints of the sex offender or child kidnapper have been previously provided to the Department of Public Safety; if legible fingerprints for the sex offense or child kidnapping have not previously been provided to the Department of Public Safety, the commissioner shall obtain the sex offender’s or child kidnapper’s fingerprints in the manner required by the Department of Public Safety and shall immediately forward the fingerprints to the department. When completing the registration or taking the photograph under this subsection, the commissioner shall also send written notice of release, parole, community placement, work release placement, or furlough of a sex offender or child kidnapper to

the chief of police of the community, if any, in which the inmate will reside;

the Alaska state trooper post located nearest to where the inmate will reside;

the village public safety officer of the rural community without a municipal police department or Alaska state trooper post in which the inmate will reside; and

the central registry of sex offenders and child kidnappers.

If an inmate convicted of a sex offense or child kidnapping escapes from a correctional facility, the commissioner shall immediately notify the Department of Public Safety and the chief of police of the community and the Alaska state trooper post located closest to where the inmate resided immediately before the inmate’s arrest and conviction.

History.

(§ 7 ch 41 SLA 1994; am § 21 ch 106 SLA 1998)

Sec. 33.30.013.
Commissioner to notify victims.

The commissioner shall notify the victim if the offender

escapes from custody;

is discharged from parole under AS 33.16; or

is released to the community on a furlough, on an early release program, or for any other reason.

The commissioner is required to give notice of a change in the status of an offender under this section only if the victim has requested notice of the change, except that the commissioner is required to give notice, mailed to the last known address of the victim, in every case of a crime involving domestic violence.

A victim who has requested notice under (b) of this section shall maintain a current, valid mailing address on file with the commissioner. The commissioner shall send the notice from the department required by this section to the victim’s last known address. The victim’s address may not be disclosed to the offender or the offender’s attorney.

The state may not be held liable in damages for the failure of the commissioner to comply with the requirements of this section.

As part of the notice under this section, the commissioner shall send the victim a photograph of the offender if the victim has specifically requested in writing that a photograph be sent. The photograph must have been taken within three weeks of the offender’s release or, if the offender escapes from custody, must be the most recent photograph in the commissioner’s possession. The photograph is for the victim’s personal use, and the victim may not make copies of the photograph for distribution to others. An offender who is released under (a) of this section shall be notified that a photograph has been sent to the victim under this subsection.

The commissioner’s duty under (a) — (c) of this section to notify a victim of a change in the status of an offender is satisfied by the notice provided by an automated victim notification system established under AS

12.61.050

.

History.

(§ 20 ch 59 SLA 1989; am §§ 14, 15 ch 57 SLA 1991; am § 58 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 73 SLA 1997; am § 156 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, designated portions of (a) as (a)(1) and (a)(3), added (a)(2).

Sec. 33.30.015.
Living conditions for prisoners.

The commissioner may not

make per capita expenditures for food for prisoners in a state correctional facility operated by the state that exceed 90 percent of per capita expenditures for food that is available to enlisted personnel in the United States Army stationed in the state;

provide, in a state correctional facility operated by the state,

living quarters for a prisoner into which the view is obstructed; however, the commissioner is not required to renovate a facility to comply with this subparagraph if the facility is being used as a correctional facility on August 27, 1997, or if the facility was already built before being acquired by the department;

equipment or facilities for publishing or broadcasting material the content of which is not subject to prior approval by the department as consistent with keeping order in the institution and prisoner discipline;

cable television service other than a level of basic cable television service that is available as a substitute for services that are broadcast to the public in the community in which a correctional facility is located;

allow a prisoner held in a state correctional facility operated by the state to

possess in the prisoner’s cell a cassette tape player or recorder, a video cassette recorder (VCR), or a computer or modem of any kind;

view movies rated “R,” “X,” or “NC-17”;

possess printed or photographic material that

is obscene as defined by the commissioner in regulation;

could reasonably be expected to incite racial, ethnic, or religious hatred that is detrimental to the security, good order, or discipline of the institution or violence;

could reasonably be expected to aid in an escape or in the theft or destruction of property;

describes procedures for brewing alcoholic beverages or for manufacturing controlled substances, weapons, or explosives; or

could reasonably be expected to facilitate criminal activity or a violation of institution rules;

receive instruction in person, or by broadcast medium, or engage in boxing, wrestling, judo, karate, or other martial art or in any activity that, in the commissioner’s discretion, would facilitate violent behavior;

possess or have access to equipment for use in the activities listed in (D) of this paragraph;

possess or have access to free weights;

possess in the prisoner’s cell a coffee pot, hot plate, appliance or heating element for food preparation, or more than three electrical appliances of any kind;

possess or appear in a state of dress, hygiene, grooming, or appearance other than as permitted as uniform or standard in the correctional facility;

use a computer other than those approved by the correctional facility; the use of a computer under this subparagraph may be approved only as part of the prisoner’s employment, education, or vocational training and may not be used for any other purpose;

smoke or use tobacco products of any kind.

The commissioner may determine whether the provisions of (a) of this section shall apply to correctional facilities that are not operated by the state and may negotiate with a provider of services for the detention and confinement of persons held under authority of state law under contract or agreement whether the living conditions set out in (a) of this section shall apply to persons held under authority of state law at a facility operated under contract or agreement.

On and after January 1, 1998, the commissioner may not allow a prisoner to possess a television in the prisoner’s cell if the prisoner is classified as maximum custody under AS

33.30.011(a)(2)

.

The commissioner may allow a prisoner who, under AS

33.30.011(a)(2)

, has been classified as other than maximum custody to possess a television in the prisoner’s cell only if the prisoner

either is incapable of obtaining or has attained a high school diploma or general education development diploma or the equivalent;

is actively engaged in an educational, vocational training, or employment program;

has satisfied or is on a regular and current payment schedule for all restitution orders entered by the court as part of the prisoner’s sentence and, if applicable, is actively engaged in a treatment plan or counseling, psychiatric, or rehabilitation program ordered by the court or the department as part of the prisoner’s sentence; and

pays for the expense of providing the television and, in addition to the utility service fee required by AS

33.30.017

, pays for the expense of providing any cable television service.

The commissioner shall use

appropriate technology to screen programs received by prisoners under (d) of this section;

Alaska farm products and salmon to the greatest extent practicable for food for prisoners in a state correctional facility operated by the state.

History.

(§ 5 ch 49 SLA 1997; am § 48 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2016, in subsections (c) and (d), "AS

33.30.011(a)(2)

" was substituted for "AS

33.30.011

(2)" to reflect the addition of AS

33.30.011(b)

.

Administrative Code. —

For operations, see 22 AAC 5, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “The” for “On and after August 27, 1999, the”.

Sec. 33.30.017.
Fees for utilities services for prisoners.

The commissioner shall establish a reasonable utility fee for electrical utilities that are used by prisoners who are confined in a state correctional facility.

The commissioner shall

charge each prisoner who possesses at least one major electrical appliance the utility fee established in (a) of this section; the commissioner may deduct the utility fee monthly from the account established for a prisoner into which money due the prisoner for labor is paid; if a prisoner is indigent, the commissioner shall make the deduction from any amount credited to the indigent inmate’s account;

if available from legislative appropriation, expend money deducted and collected under (1) of this subsection to offset the cost of the department’s utility expenses; the commissioner shall annually report on the amounts that are collected and expended under this paragraph.

The provisions of (b) of this section do not apply to prisoners

who are

developmentally disabled; or

severely medically or cognitively disabled, as that term is defined in AS

33.16.900

;

who are housed in a mental health unit or psychiatric unit of a state correctional facility; or

while placed in a state correctional facility awaiting classification under classification procedures for the purpose of making the appropriate assignment of the prisoner.

History.

(§ 5 ch 49 SLA 1997; am § 7 ch 25 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For operations, see 22 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 33.30.020.
Commissioner to establish and administer prison facilities. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.021.
Regulations.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations to implement this chapter.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For regulations adopted under this section, see generally 22 AAC 05.

Administrative Code. —

For admission to adult correctional facilities, see 22 AAC 5, art. 1.

For security, see 22 AAC 5, art. 2.

For operations, see 22 AAC 5, art. 3.

For classification, see 22 AAC 5, art. 4.

For programs, see 22 AAC 5, art. 5.

For discipline, see 22 AAC 5, art. 6.

For segregation, see 22 AAC 5, art. 7.

For communications, see 22 AAC 5, art. 8.

For discharge, see 22 AAC 5, art. 9.

For sex offender treatment providers, see 22 AAC 30.

Sec. 33.30.025.
Siting of prison facilities.

The commissioner shall notify each community council established by municipal charter or ordinance of the department’s plans to locate a prison facility or to contract for the operation of a prison facility, community residential facility, or other rehabilitation program if the facility or proposed facility will be within one-half mile of the boundary of the area represented by a community council.

History.

(§ 4 ch 100 SLA 1988)

Sec. 33.30.026.
Procurement Code applicable to contracts.

Contracting for services under this chapter is governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

History.

(§ 54 ch 14 SLA 1987)

Sec. 33.30.028.
Responsibility for costs of medical care.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the liability for payment of the costs of medical, psychological, and psychiatric care provided or made available to a prisoner committed to the custody of the commissioner is, subject to (b) of this section, the responsibility of the prisoner and the

prisoner’s insurer if the prisoner is insured under existing individual health insurance, group health insurance, or any prepaid medical coverage;

Department of Health and Social Services if the prisoner is eligible for assistance under AS 47.07 or AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

;

United States Department of Veterans Affairs if the prisoner is eligible for veterans’ benefits that entitle the prisoner to reimbursement for the medical care or medical services;

United States Public Health Service, the Indian Health Service, or any affiliated group or agency if the prisoner is a Native American and is entitled to medical care from those agencies or groups; and

parent or guardian of the prisoner if the prisoner is under the age of 18.

The commissioner shall require prisoners who are without resources under (a) of this section to pay the costs of medical, psychological, and psychiatric care provided to them by the department. At a minimum, the prisoner shall be required to pay a portion of the costs based upon the prisoner’s ability to pay.

The commissioner shall apply for medical assistance under AS 47.07 and for general relief assistance under AS

47.25.120

-

47.25.300

on behalf of a prisoner incarcerated in a correctional facility to establish medical assistance coverage or general relief assistance for the prisoner during a period of hospitalization outside of the correctional facility.

The commissioner may obtain information necessary to determine whether a prisoner incarcerated in a correctional facility is eligible for medical assistance under AS 47.07 or public assistance under AS 47.25. Information obtained under this subsection may be used only for the purpose of applying for medical assistance or public assistance under (c) of this section and may not be disclosed for any other purpose without the permission of the prisoner. An employee of the commissioner who discloses a prisoner’s social security number in an application for medical assistance or public assistance under this section is considered to be acting in the performance of the employee’s duties or responsibilities under AS

45.48.400(b)

.

History.

(§ 13 ch 70 SLA 1995; am § 38 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 35 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For operations, see 22 AAC 5, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, added (c) and (d).

Sec. 33.30.030.
Commissioner to adopt regulations. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.031.
Contracts for confinement and care of prisoners.

The commissioner shall determine the availability of state correctional facilities suitable for the detention and confinement of persons held under authority of state law or under agreement entered into under (e) of this section. If the commissioner determines that suitable state correctional facilities are not available, the commissioner may enter into an agreement with a public or private agency to provide necessary facilities. Correctional facilities provided through agreement with a public agency for the detention and confinement of persons held under authority of state law may be in this state or in another state. Correctional facilities provided through agreement with a private agency must be located in this state unless the commissioner finds in writing that (1) there is no other reasonable alternative for detention in the state; and (2) the agreement is necessary because of health or security considerations involving a particular prisoner or class of prisoners, or because an emergency of prisoner overcrowding is imminent. The commissioner may not enter into an agreement with an agency unable to provide a degree of custody, care, and discipline similar to that required by the laws of this state.

[Repealed, § 37 ch 2 FSSLA 1992.]

Notwithstanding AS

36.30.300

, an agreement with a private agency to provide necessary facilities under (a) of this section must be based on competitive bids.

A person employed outside the facility while confined in a privately operated correctional facility established under (a) of this section is subject to the provisions of AS

33.30.131

.

The commissioner may enter into an agreement with the United States, another state, a municipality of this state, or another state agency, to provide a correctional facility for the custody, care, and discipline of a person held under authority of the law of that jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986; am § 49 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 55 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 14 ch 90 SLA 1991; am §§ 5, 37 ch 2 FSSLA 1992)

Cross references. —

For interstate compacts concerning the confinement of inmates, see AS 33.36.

Administrative Code. —

For classification, see 22 AAC 5, art. 4.

For programs, see 22 AAC 5, art. 5.

Opinions of attorney general. —

On September 4, 1986, the commissioner of corrections obtained authority to contract for the placement of prisoners found guilty but not mentally ill into privately operated treatment facilities. July 8, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 33.30.035.
Notice to sex offenders or child kidnappers of registration and other requirements.

The department shall provide written notice to a sex offender or child kidnapper of the registration, verification, and change of address requirements of AS

12.63.010

and shall obtain a written receipt of notice from the sex offender or child kidnapper (1) at the time of the sex offender’s or child kidnapper’s release from a state correctional facility; (2) immediately after taking supervision of a sex offender or child kidnapper under the Interstate Corrections Compact or AS

33.36.110

. The department shall forward the written receipt to the Department of Public Safety, along with a description of any identifying features of the offender or kidnapper, the anticipated address of the offender or kidnapper, and a statement concerning whether the offender or kidnapper has received treatment for the offender’s or kidnapper’s mental abnormality or personality disorder related to the sex offense or child kidnapping. In this section, “sex offense” and “child kidnapping” have the meanings given in AS

12.63.100

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 41 SLA 1994; am § 22 ch 106 SLA 1998)

Sec. 33.30.040.
Duty of commissioner to provide prison facilities. [Repealed, § 12 ch 88 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 33.30.041.
Lease of correctional facility to municipality.

If the commissioner determines that it would be in the best interest of the state, the commissioner may enter into an agreement with a municipality of the state for the lease of a state correctional facility or for the use and operation of a state correctional facility for the joint benefit of the municipality and the state.

An agreement executed by the commissioner under (a) of this section must provide that

the state has the right to detain or confine a prisoner held under authority of law in the correctional facility;

the administrator of the correctional facility agrees to implement an order, concerning a prisoner, issued by a court of the state;

the administrator of the correctional facility shall comply with the law, and regulations adopted by the commissioner, relating to the custody, care, and discipline of a prisoner detained or confined in the correctional facility; and

the commissioner may inspect the correctional facility at any time to determine the conditions under which a prisoner is detained or confined.

The agreement executed by the commissioner under (a) of this section may require the administrator of the correctional facility to comply with requirements that the commissioner considers necessary for the protection of the public or for the quality of care and programs for prisoners required by this chapter and regulations adopted by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1986)